Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7 Joint Committee on Accounts and Claims

22-7-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

The joint committee on accounts and claims, previously created under joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives, shall consist of four (4) members of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate and five (5) members of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker, and is created as the permanent joint committee on accounts and claims of the general assembly. The members of this joint committee on accounts and claims shall serve until their successors shall be duly appointed as provided in this chapter and until the successors shall have been duly qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-1

; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 14; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 24; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 68.

22-7-2.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the joint committee, by majority vote, one of their number shall be chosen as chairperson and another of their number shall be chosen vice-chairperson, and, by like vote, they shall choose a clerk, who shall not be one of their own number.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-2

.

22-7-3.
Filling of vacancies.

Vacancies in the membership of the joint committee shall be filled in a like manner as the original appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-3

; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 14.

22-7-4.
Investigation of claims.

It shall be the first duty of the joint committee to investigate all claims against the state coming before it for determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-4

.

22-7-5.
Adjustment and compromise of claims.

It shall be the further duty of the joint committee to exhaust all possibility of adjustment and compromise of valid claims before hearing on them. To this end, the claimant on the one hand and the state, acting through the department, division, bureau, or other state agency having immediate charge of the subject matter of the claim, on the other hand may stipulate and agree upon the amount and manner of making final disposition of the claim. The stipulation and agreement may, but need not, be adopted by the joint committee as its findings and its determination of the claim.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-5

.

22-7-6.
Reference and reports on resolutions for payments.

Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee created in this chapter all resolutions for the payment of sundry accounts presented to it while in session, and the joint committee shall immediately report its findings when in favor of the claimant to the branch by which the resolution was referred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-6

.

22-7-7.
Compensation of clerk.

The clerk of the joint committee shall receive a sum per annum as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-7

; P.L. 1961, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 2.

22-7-8.
Place of meetings — Quorum.

Adequate space shall be provided in the state house for the use of the joint committee in the performance of its duties, but the joint committee may hold its meetings and conduct its hearings elsewhere when doing so will better serve the convenience of claimants or the committee. A majority in number of the committee shall at all times constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3438, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

22-7-8

.